Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-19,121
Unfair trade practice.

In addition to any other remedies available under the laws of this state, each violation of the Title Insurance Agent Act and any rules and regulations adopted and promulgated thereunder shall be an unfair trade practice in the business of insurance subject to the Unfair Insurance Trade Practices Act.

Laws 1997, LB 53, § 44.

Unfair Insurance Trade Practices Act, see section 44-1521.